Utah statutes.
58-78-301.   License required.

(1)  Beginning January 1, 2010, and except as provided in Sections 58-1-307 and 58-78-304, a license is required to engage in the practice of vocational rehabilitation counseling.

(2)  The division shall issue to an individual who qualifies under this chapter a license to practice vocational rehabilitation counseling.



Enacted by Chapter 122, 2009 General Session

